Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3746.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CANCELLATION AND APPROPRIATION; BUS RAPID TRANSIT.new text end new text begin (a) The unencumbered balance from the appropriation under Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 1, section 3, subdivision 2, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 1, section 11, for the Blue Line light rail transit extension project is canceled to the general fund on June 29, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) The amount canceled under paragraph (a), if any, is appropriated in fiscal year 2027 from the general fund to the Metropolitan Council for development of an arterial bus rapid transit line in the proposed corridor of the Blue Line light rail transit extension project. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end